Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202675-365
Federal motor carrier regulations; definitions; applicability; report; requirements; adoption by reference; when effective.

(1) Definitions contained in the regulations referred to in sections 75-363 and 75-364 shall only apply to such regulations.

(2) When the regulations referred to in sections 75-363 and 75-364 require that any person submit a report to the United States Department of Transportation or any other federal agency, that person shall also submit a copy of the report to the Nebraska State Patrol.

(3) For purposes of sections 75-362 to 75-369.07, when a provision of any of such sections refers to the date specified in this section, such date is January 1, 2026.

Laws 1986, LB 301, § 3;

Laws 2025, LB398, § 59;

Laws 2026, LB781, § 9.
April 15, 2026